Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.56.520

Certification and transmittal of result.

The vote of each member shall be recorded in the journal of the convention, which shall be preserved by the secretary of state as a public document. The action of the convention shall be enrolled, signed by its president and secretary and filed with the secretary of state and it shall be the duty of the secretary of state to properly certify the action of the convention to the Congress of the United States as provided by general law.

[ 2003 c 111 s 1441; 1965 c 9 s 29.74.130. Prior: (i) 1933 c 181 s 7, part; RRS s 5249-7, part. (ii) 1933 c 181 s 8, part; RRS s 5249-8, part. Formerly RCW 29.74.130.]